Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2621
Sales of cattle; recovery of damages.

A seller may bring an action against any packer violating section 54-2617 or 54-2619 to recover damages sustained by reason of such violation.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 21.